Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,239.11
Settlements and judgments; state agency; Attorney General; filing required; insufficient funds; Risk Manager; duties.

A state agency head shall file copies of all settlements, and a state agency head or the Attorney General shall file copies of all final, nonappealable judgments, of all self-insured liability claims with the Risk Manager. If the state agency has insufficient funds to pay the settlement or judgment, the state agency shall notify and provide documentation of such insufficient funds to the Risk Manager. The Risk Manager shall then submit the settlement or judgment to the Legislature in the same manner as provided in the State Miscellaneous Claims Act. The Legislature shall review the settlement or judgment and make an appropriation if appropriate.

Laws 2007, LB256, § 7;

Laws 2022, LB922, § 11.

State Miscellaneous Claims Act, see section 81-8,294.